Tennessee, session 114, SB2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-102-127, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a)
(1) The commissioner of commerce and insurance and the
commissioner's deputies have police powers when necessary to preserve the law
relative to cases of arson or suspected arson, including the power to make
arrests; provided, that, the individual seeking to exercise the powers has a
current certification from the peace officer standards and training commission
(POST). In addition, the commissioner and the commissioner's deputies may
conduct further investigations as to the origin or circumstances of a fire occurring
in this state by the appointment of special assistants or the employment of other
means necessary in the commissioner's discretion.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) does not prohibit the commissioner or the
commissioner's deputies from otherwise conducting investigations as to the
origin or circumstances of a fire occurring in this state without a current
certification from POST if the commissioner or the commissioner's deputy is not
exercising police powers in conducting the investigation.
(b)
SB2005
009119
- 1 -

(1) A municipal fire investigator has police powers, including the power to
make arrests, when necessary to preserve the laws of this state or the
investigator's respective municipality relative to cases of arson or suspected
arson if the municipal fire investigator:
(A) Has been authorized by the chief of the municipal fire
department or the director of fire services to conduct investigations
relative to the cause and origin of fires or arson investigations; and
(B) Has a current certification from POST.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) does not prohibit a municipal fire investigator from
conducting an investigation relative to the cause and origin of a fire or arson
investigations without a current certification from POST if the municipal fire
investigator is not exercising police powers in conducting the investigation.
(c)
(1) A salaried county fire investigator has police powers, including the
power to make arrests, when necessary to preserve the laws of this state or the
investigator's respective jurisdiction relative to cases of arson or suspected arson
if the salaried county fire investigator:
(A) Has been authorized by the chief of the county-wide fire
department or the director of fire services to conduct investigations
relative to the cause and origin of fires or arson investigations; and
(B) Has a current certification from POST.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) does not prohibit a salaried county fire investigator
from conducting an investigation relative to the cause and origin of a fire or arson
investigations without a current certification from POST if the salaried county fire
investigator is not exercising police powers in conducting the investigation.
- 2 - 009119

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-107, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h) The commission shall also issue a certificate of compliance to the
commissioner of commerce and insurance; the commissioner's deputies; a municipal fire
investigator, as described in § 68-102-127(b)(1); or a salaried county fire investigator, as
described in § 68-102-127(c)(1), on or after January 1, 2027, if the person meets the
qualifications for employment as a police officer and satisfactorily completes an
approved recruit training program as required by this part. To retain this certification, the
person shall also successfully complete an annual in-service training session
appropriate for the fire investigator's responsibilities.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on or after that date.
- 3 - 009119